Hawaii statutes.
§205A-6 Cause of action. (a) Subject
to chapters 661 and 662, any person or agency may commence a civil action
alleging that any agency:

(1) Is not in compliance with one or more of the
objectives, policies, and guidelines provided or authorized by this chapter
within the special management area and the waters from the shoreline to the
seaward limit of the State's jurisdiction; or

(2) Has failed to perform any act or duty required to
be performed under this chapter; or

(3) In exercising any duty required to be performed
under this chapter, has not complied with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) In any action brought under this section,
the lead agency, if not a party, may intervene as a matter of right.

(c) A court, in any action brought under this
section, shall have jurisdiction to provide any relief as may be appropriate,
including a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction.

(d) Any action brought under this section
shall be commenced within sixty days of the act which is the basis of the
action.

(e) Nothing in this section shall restrict any
right that any person may have to assert any other claim or bring any other
action. [L 1977, c 188, pt of §3; am L 1979, c 200, §5]

Law Journals and Reviews

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under Hawai`i
Constitution Article XI, Section 9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive
Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367 (2010).

Case Notes

Judicial intervention under this section should not precede
resolution of issues by administrative agency. 69 H. 81, 734 P.2d 161.

Section allowed plaintiff to bring generic declaratory action
under §632-1 without the need to proceed under this section. 75 H. 237, 858
P.2d 726.

Where the appellant failed to file an appeal with the Maui
planning commission regarding the county director of planning's issuance of a
special management area minor permit, the doctrine of primary jurisdiction
warranted dismissal of the case; the circuit court did not abuse its discretion
in choosing to refrain from exercising jurisdiction. 132 H. 472 (App.), 323
P.3d 116 (2012).

Where the defendants contended that the case was moot because
it pertained to the issuance of a special management area minor permit for an
event that occurred prior to appeal, the appeal retained vitality because the
questions presented were of public concern and, in the likely event that they
recurred in the future, were of a nature that would likely become moot before
they could be determined on appeal. 132 H. 472 (App.), 323 P.3d 116 (2012).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next